Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Part 3

— Receipts Normally Apportioned

28-70-408. Insubstantial allocations not required.

If a trustee determines that an allocation between principal and income required by §28-70-409, §28-70-410, §28-70-411, §28-70-412, or §28-70-415 is insubstantial, the trustee may allocate the entire amount to principal unless one of the circumstances described in §28-70-104(c) applies to the allocation. This power may be exercised by a cotrustee in the circumstances described in §28-70-104(d) and may be released for the reasons and in the manner described in §28-70-104(e). An allocation is presumed to be insubstantial if:

the amount of the allocation would increase or decrease net income in an accounting period, as determined before the allocation, by less than 10 percent; or

the value of the asset producing the receipt for which the allocation would be made is less than 10 percent of the total value of the trust's assets at the beginning of the accounting period.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 408.

28-70-409. Deferred compensation, annuities, and similar payments.

In this section:

“Payment” means a payment that a trustee may receive over a fixed number of years or during the life of one or more individuals because of services rendered or property transferred to the payer in exchange for future payments. The term includes a payment made in money or property from the payer's general assets or from a separate fund created by the payer. For purposes of subsections (d), (e), (f), and (g) the term also includes a payment from any separate fund, regardless of the reason for the payment.

“Separate fund” includes a private or commercial annuity, an individual retirement account, and a pension, profit-sharing, stock-bonus, or stock-ownership plan.

To the extent that a payment is characterized as interest, a dividend, or a payment made in lieu of interest or a dividend, a trustee shall allocate the payment to income. The trustee shall allocate to principal the balance of the payment and any other payment received in the same accounting period that is not characterized as interest, a dividend, or an equivalent payment.

If no part of a payment is characterized as interest, a dividend, or an equivalent payment, and all or part of the payment is required to be made, a trustee shall allocate to income 10 percent of the part that is required to be made during the accounting period and the balance to principal. If no part of a payment is required to be made or the payment received is the entire amount to which the trustee is entitled, the trustee shall allocate the entire payment to principal. For purposes of this subsection, a payment is not “required to be made” to the extent that it is made because the trustee exercises a right of withdrawal.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e), subsections (f) and (g) apply, and subsections (b) and (c) do not apply, in determining the allocation of a payment made from a separate fund to:

a trust to which an election to qualify for a marital deduction under Section 2056(b)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 2056(b)(7), as in effect January 1, 2011, has been made; or

a trust that qualifies for the marital deduction under Section 2056(b)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 2056(b)(5), as in effect January 1, 2011.

Subsections (d), (f), and (g) do not apply if and to the extent that the series of payments would, without the application of subsection (d), qualify for the marital deduction under Section 2056(b)(7)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 2056(b)(7)(C), as in effect January 1, 2011.

A trustee shall determine the internal income of each separate fund for the accounting period as if the separate fund were a trust subject to this chapter. Upon request of the surviving spouse, the trustee shall demand that the person administering the separate fund distribute the internal income to the trust. The trustee shall allocate a payment from the separate fund to income to the extent of the internal income of the separate fund and distribute that amount to the surviving spouse. The trustee shall allocate the balance of the payment to principal. Upon request of the surviving spouse, the trustee shall allocate principal to income to the extent the internal income of the separate fund exceeds payments made from the separate fund to the trust during the accounting period.

If a trustee cannot determine the internal income of a separate fund but can determine the value of the separate fund, the internal income of the separate fund is deemed to equal three percent of the fund's value, according to the most recent statement of value preceding the beginning of the accounting period. If the trustee can determine neither the internal income of the separate fund nor the fund's value, the internal income of the fund is deemed to equal the product of the interest rate and the present value of the expected future payments, as determined under Section 7520 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 7520, as in effect January 1, 2011, for the month preceding the accounting period for which the computation is made.

This section does not apply to a payment to which § 28-70-410 applies.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment subdivided part of former (a) as (a)(1) and (2); added the last sentence in (a)(1); added “‘Separate fund’ includes” at the beginning of (a)(2); substituted “allocate the payment” for “allocate it” in (b); rewrote (d); added present (e) through (g); and redesignated former (e) as (h).

If received as nominal delay rental or nominal annual rent on a lease, a receipt must be allocated to income.

If received from a production payment, a receipt must be allocated to income if and to the extent that the agreement creating the production payment provides a factor for interest or its equivalent. The balance must be allocated to principal.

If an amount received as a royalty, shut-in-well payment, take-or-pay payment, bonus, or delay rental is more than nominal, 90 percent must be allocated to principal and the balance to income.

If an amount is received from a working interest or any other interest not provided for in paragraph (1), (2), or (3), 90 percent of the net amount received must be allocated to principal and the balance to income.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 409; 2011, No. 132, § 1.

28-70-410. Liquidating asset.

In this section, “liquidating asset” means an asset whose value will diminish or terminate because the asset is expected to produce receipts for a period of limited duration. The term includes a leasehold, patent, copyright, royalty right, and right to receive payments during a period of more than one year under an arrangement that does not provide for the payment of interest on the unpaid balance. The term does not include a payment subject to §28-70-409, resources subject to §28-70-411, timber subject to §28-70-412, an activity subject to §28-70-414, an asset subject to §28-70-415, or any asset for which the trustee establishes a reserve for depreciation under §28-70-503.

A trustee shall allocate to income 10 percent of the receipts from a liquidating asset and the balance to principal.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 410.

28-70-411. Minerals, water, and other natural resources.

To the extent that a trustee accounts for receipts from an interest in minerals or other natural resources pursuant to this section, the trustee shall allocate them as follows:

An amount received on account of an interest in water that is renewable must be allocated to income. If the water is not renewable, 90 percent of the amount must be allocated to principal and the balance to income.

This chapter applies whether or not a decedent or donor was extracting minerals, water, or other natural resources before the interest became subject to the trust.

If a trust owns an interest in minerals, water, or other natural resources on January 1, 2000, the trustee may allocate receipts from the interest as provided in this chapter or in the manner used by the trustee before January 1, 2000. If the trust acquires an interest in minerals, water, or other natural resources after January 1, 2000, the trustee shall allocate receipts from the interest as provided in this chapter.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 411.

28-70-412. Timber.

To the extent that a trustee accounts for receipts from the sale of timber and related products pursuant to this section, the trustee shall allocate the net receipts:

to income to the extent that the amount of timber removed from the land does not exceed the rate of growth of the timber during the accounting periods in which a beneficiary has a mandatory income interest;

to principal to the extent that the amount of timber removed from the land exceeds the rate of growth of the timber or the net receipts are from the sale of standing timber;

to or between income and principal if the net receipts are from the lease of timberland or from a contract to cut timber from land owned by a trust, by determining the amount of timber removed from the land under the lease or contract and applying the rules in paragraphs (1) and (2); or

to principal to the extent that advance payments, bonuses, and other payments are not allocated pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), or (3).

In determining net receipts to be allocated pursuant to subsection (a), a trustee shall deduct and transfer to principal a reasonable amount for depletion.

This chapter applies whether or not a decedent or transferor was harvesting timber from the property before it became subject to the trust.

If a trust owns an interest in timberland on January 1, 2000, the trustee may allocate net receipts from the sale of timber and related products as provided in this chapter or in the manner used by the trustee before January 1, 2000. If the trust acquires an interest in timberland after January 1, 2000, the trustee shall allocate net receipts from the sale of timber and related products as provided in this chapter.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 412.

28-70-413. Property not productive of income.

If a marital deduction is allowed for all or part of a trust whose assets consist substantially of property that does not provide the surviving spouse with sufficient income from or use of the trust assets, and if the amounts that the trustee transfers from principal to income under §28-70-104 and distributes to the spouse from principal pursuant to the terms of the trust are insufficient to provide the spouse with the beneficial enjoyment required to obtain the marital deduction, the spouse may require the trustee to make property productive of income, convert property within a reasonable time, or exercise the power conferred by §28-70-104(a). The trustee may decide which action or combination of actions to take.

In cases not governed by subsection (a), proceeds from the sale or other disposition of an asset are principal without regard to the amount of income the asset produces during any accounting period.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 413.

28-70-414. Derivatives and options.

In this section, “derivative” means a contract or financial instrument or a combination of contracts and financial instruments which gives a trust the right or obligation to participate in some or all changes in the price of a tangible or intangible asset or group of assets, or changes in a rate, an index of prices or rates, or other market indicator for an asset or a group of assets.

To the extent that a trustee accounts for transactions in derivatives pursuant to this section, the trustee shall allocate to principal receipts from and disbursements made in connection with those transactions.

If a trustee grants an option to buy property from the trust, whether or not the trust owns the property when the option is granted, grants an option that permits another person to sell property to the trust, or acquires an option to buy property for the trust or an option to sell an asset owned by the trust, and the trustee or other owner of the asset is required to deliver the asset if the option is exercised, an amount received for granting the option must be allocated to principal. An amount paid to acquire the option must be paid from principal. A gain or loss realized upon the exercise of an option, including an option granted to a settlor of the trust for services rendered, must be allocated to principal.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 414.

28-70-415. Asset-backed securities.

In this section, “asset-backed security” means an asset whose value is based upon the right it gives the owner to receive distributions from the proceeds of financial assets that provide collateral for the security. The term includes an asset that gives the owner the right to receive from the collateral financial assets only the interest or other current return or only the proceeds other than interest or current return. The term does not include an asset to which §28-70-401 or §28-70-409 applies.

If a trust receives a payment from interest or other current return and from other proceeds of the collateral financial assets, the trustee shall allocate to income the portion of the payment which the payer identifies as being from interest or other current return and shall allocate the balance of the payment to principal.

If a trust receives one or more payments in exchange for the trust's entire interest in an asset-backed security in one accounting period, the trustee shall allocate the payments to principal. If a payment is one of a series of payments that will result in the liquidation of the trust's interest in the security over more than one accounting period, the trustee shall allocate 10 percent of the payment to income and the balance to principal.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 415.

Subchapter 5

— Allocation of Disbursements During Administration of Trust

28-70-501. Disbursements from income.

A trustee shall make the following disbursements from income to the extent that they are not disbursements to which §28-70-201(2)(B) or (C) applies:

one-half of the regular compensation of the trustee and of any person providing investment advisory or custodial services to the trustee;

one-half of all expenses for accountings, judicial proceedings, or other matters that involve both the income and remainder interests;

all of the other ordinary expenses incurred in connection with the administration, management, or preservation of trust property and the distribution of income, including interest, ordinary repairs, regularly recurring taxes assessed against principal, and expenses of a proceeding or other matter that concerns primarily the income interest; and

recurring premiums on insurance covering the loss of a principal asset or the loss of income from or use of the asset.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 501.

28-70-502. Disbursements from principal.

A trustee shall make the following disbursements from principal:

the remaining one-half of the disbursements described in § 28-70-501(1) and (2);

all of the trustee's compensation calculated on principal as a fee for acceptance, distribution, or termination, and disbursements made to prepare property for sale;

payments on the principal of a trust debt;

expenses of a proceeding that concerns primarily principal, including a proceeding to construe the trust or to protect the trust or its property;

premiums paid on a policy of insurance not described in § 28-70-501(4) of which the trust is the owner and beneficiary;

estate, inheritance, and other transfer taxes, including penalties, apportioned to the trust; and

disbursements related to environmental matters, including reclamation, assessing environmental conditions, remedying and removing environmental contamination, monitoring remedial activities and the release of substances, preventing future releases of substances, collecting amounts from persons liable or potentially liable for the costs of those activities, penalties imposed under environmental laws or regulations and other payments made to comply with those laws or regulations, statutory or common law claims by third parties, and defending claims based on environmental matters.

If a principal asset is encumbered with an obligation that requires income from that asset to be paid directly to the creditor, the trustee shall transfer from principal to income an amount equal to the income paid to the creditor in reduction of the principal balance of the obligation.

of that portion of real property used or available for use by a beneficiary as a residence or of tangible personal property held or made available for the personal use or enjoyment of a beneficiary;

during the administration of a decedent's estate; or

under this section if the trustee is accounting under § 28-70-403 for the business or activity in which the asset is used.

An amount transferred to principal need not be held as a separate fund.

an amount chargeable to income but paid from principal because it is unusually large, including extraordinary repairs;

a capital improvement to a principal asset, whether in the form of changes to an existing asset or the construction of a new asset, including special assessments;

disbursements made to prepare property for rental, including tenant allowances, leasehold improvements, and broker's commissions;

periodic payments on an obligation secured by a principal asset to the extent that the amount transferred from income to principal for depreciation is less than the periodic payments; and

disbursements described in § 28-70-502(a)(7).

After applying subsections (a) through (c), the trustee shall adjust income or principal receipts to the extent that the trust's taxes are reduced because the trust receives a deduction for payments made to a beneficiary.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment deleted “proportionately” from the end of the introductory language of (c); inserted “only” in (c)(1) and (2);deleted (c)(2)(B); added (c)(3) and (4); and rewrote (d).

elections and decisions, other than those described in subsection (b), that the fiduciary makes from time to time regarding tax matters;

an income tax or any other tax that is imposed upon the fiduciary or a beneficiary as a result of a transaction involving or a distribution from the estate or trust; or

the ownership by an estate or trust of an interest in an entity whose taxable income, whether or not distributed, is includable in the taxable income of the estate, trust, or a beneficiary.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 502.

28-70-503. Transfers from income to principal for depreciation.

In this section, “depreciation” means a reduction in value due to wear, tear, decay, corrosion, or gradual obsolescence of a fixed asset having a useful life of more than one year.

A trustee may transfer to principal a reasonable amount of the net cash receipts from a principal asset that is subject to depreciation, but may not transfer any amount for depreciation:

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 503.

28-70-504. Transfers from income to reimburse principal.

If a trustee makes or expects to make a principal disbursement described in this section, the trustee may transfer an appropriate amount from income to principal in one or more accounting periods to reimburse principal or to provide a reserve for future principal disbursements.

Principal disbursements to which subsection (a) applies include the following, but only to the extent that the trustee has not been and does not expect to be reimbursed by a third party:

If the asset whose ownership gives rise to the disbursements becomes subject to a successive income interest after an income interest ends, a trustee may continue to transfer amounts from income to principal as provided in subsection (a).

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 504.

28-70-505. Income taxes.

A tax required to be paid by a trustee based on receipts allocated to income must be paid from income.

A tax required to be paid by a trustee based on receipts allocated to principal must be paid from principal, even if the tax is called an income tax by the taxing authority.

A tax required to be paid by a trustee on the trust's share of an entity's taxable income must be paid:

from income to the extent that receipts from the entity are allocated only to income;

from principal to the extent that receipts from the entity are allocated only to principal;

proportionately from principal and income to the extent that receipts from the entity are allocated to both income and principal; and

from principal to the extent that the tax exceeds the total receipts from the entity.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 505; 2011, No. 132, § 2.

28-70-506. Adjustments between principal and income because of taxes.

A fiduciary may make adjustments between principal and income to offset the shifting of economic interests or tax benefits between income beneficiaries and remainder beneficiaries which arise from:

If the amount of an estate tax marital deduction or charitable contribution deduction is reduced because a fiduciary deducts an amount paid from principal for income tax purposes instead of deducting it for estate tax purposes, and as a result estate taxes paid from principal are increased and income taxes paid by an estate, trust, or beneficiary are decreased, each estate, trust, or beneficiary that benefits from the decrease in income tax shall reimburse the principal from which the increase in estate tax is paid. The total reimbursement must equal the increase in the estate tax to the extent that the principal used to pay the increase would have qualified for a marital deduction or charitable contribution deduction but for the payment. The proportionate share of the reimbursement for each estate, trust, or beneficiary whose income taxes are reduced must be the same as its proportionate share of the total decrease in income tax. An estate or trust shall reimburse principal from income.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 506.

Subchapter 6

— Miscellaneous Provisions

28-70-601. Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this Uniform Act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among States that enact it.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 601.

Meaning of “this act”. Acts 1999, No. 647, codified as §§28-70-101 —28-70-605.

28-70-602. Severability clause.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 602.

28-70-603. [Reserved.]

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1999, No. 647, § 603, repealed former §§28-70-101 —28-70-118, concerning the Revised Uniform Principal and Income Act. For present comparable provisions, see §§28-70-101 —28-70-605.

28-70-604. Effective date.

This chapter takes effect on January 1, 2000.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 604.

28-70-605. Application of chapter to existing trusts and estates.

This chapter applies to every trust or decedent's estate existing on January 1, 2000, except as otherwise expressly provided in the will or terms of the trust or in this chapter.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 605.

28-70-606. Transitional matters.

Section28-70-409, as amended by this act, applies to a trust described in §28-70-409(d) on and after the following dates:

If the trust is not funded as of July 27, 2011, the date of the decedent's death.

If the trust is initially funded in the calendar year beginning January 1, 2011, the date of the decedent's death.

If the trust is not described in paragraph (1) or (2), January 1, 2012.

Meaning of “this act”. Acts 2011, No. 132, codified as §§28-70-409,28-70-505, and28-70-606.

Effective Dates. Acts 1985, No. 905, § 5: Apr. 15, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that financial institutions and fiduciaries should be allowed to invest a small portion of their assets in Arkansas private venture capital projects and thereby contribute to the economic health of this State; that as soon as this Act goes into effect that more funds will be available for Arkansas private venture capital projects and that this Act should therefore be given immediate effect. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Am. Jur. 31 Am. Jur. 2d, Exec. & Ad., § 228 et seq.

39 Am. Jur. 2d, Guar. & W., § 145 et seq.

76 Am. Jur. 2d, Trusts, § 476 et seq.

Ark. L. Rev.

Prudent Man Rule Applicable to Investments by Fiduciaries, 9 Ark. L. Rev. 407.

C.J.S. 34 C.J.S., Exec. & Ad., § 223 et seq.

39 C.J.S., Guar. & W., § 115 et seq.

90A C.J.S., Trusts, § 482 et seq.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 132, § 3.